test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-soddadem_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - šoddâdem: # 1Ae á-stems
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Nom: šoddâdem
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Gen: šoddâdem
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Acc: šoddâdem
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Ill: šoddâdmân
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Loc: šoddâdmist
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Com: šoddâdmáin
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Abe: šoddâdemttáá
    šoddâdem+N+Ess: šoddâdmin
    šoddâdem+N+Par: šoddâdmid
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Nom: šoddâdmeh
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Gen: šoddâdmij
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Acc: šoddâdmijd
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Ill: šoddâdmáid
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Loc: šoddâdmijn
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Com: šoddâdmijguin
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Abe: šoddâdmijttáá
    
